Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-2120
Act, how cited.

Sections
60-2120 to 60-2139 shall be known and may be cited as the Motorcycle Safety
Education Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1004, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 25, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 4.